Arkansas, session 2025, HB1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - STATE'S CONTRIBUTIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for disbursements for Arkansas'
contribution to various interstate organizations by the Department of Finance
and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ASSOCIATION OF RACING COMMISSIONERS $21,000
(02) COUNCIL OF STATE GOVERNMENT 183,000
(03) DELTA REGIONAL AUTHORITY 235,000
*JAP008*
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
(04) FEDERATION OF TAX ADMINISTRATORS 23,500
(05) INTERSTATE MINING COMPACT 18,890
(06) LOW LEVEL RADIOACTIVE WASTE COMPACT 5,000
(07) MULTI-STATE TAX COMMISSION 318,300
(08) NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF ATTORNEYS GENERAL 90,000
(09) NATIONAL ASSOCIATION OF STATE BUDGET OFFICERS 24,500
(10) NATIONAL CENTER FOR STATE COURTS 158,000
(11) NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF INSURANCE LEGISLATORS 20,000
(12) NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF STATE LEGISLATURES 197,000
(13) NATIONAL CONFERENCE ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS 60,000
(14) NATIONAL GOVERNORS ASSOCIATION 90,000
(15) SOUTHERN REGIONAL EDUCATION BOARD 226,000
(16) SOUTHERN STATES ENERGY BOARD 32,000
(17) STATE AND LOCAL LEGAL CENTER 6,900
(18) THE ENERGY COUNCIL 38,400
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,747,490

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - MISCELLANEOUS TRANSFERS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous State Treasury Funds, for providing constitutional
officers and various state agencies with supplemental appropriations by the
Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUND TO EXPENDITURES $1,000,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES EXTRA HELP 3,500,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES OVERTIME 10,000,000
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES STIPENDS 550,000
(05) PERSONAL SERVICES-PAYPLAN ADJUSTMENT 88,500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $103,550,000

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - MISCELLANEOUS GRANTS AND EXPENSES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for miscellaneous
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
grants and expenses of the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AGA/VOCATIONAL PROGRAM CERTIFICATION
EXPENSES $10,000
(02) BABY SHARON'S CHILDREN'S CATASTROPHIC
ILLNESS GRANT PROGRAM 50,000
(03) INTERSTATE PLANNING GRANTS 90,000
(04) INTRASTATE METRO PLANNING GRANTS 90,000
(05) MID-AMERICA MUSEUM GRANT 25,000
(06) MUSEUM OF DISCOVERY GRANT 25,000
(07) PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT GRANTS 360,000
(08) PUBLIC DEFENDER REIMBURSEMENT 34,372
(09) INNOVATION & PROJECT DEVELOPMENT 229,034
(10) MORGAN NICK FOUNDATION 400,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,313,406

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - FIREMEN'S AND POLICE OFFICERS' PENSION AND
RELIEF FUND. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension
and Relief Fund, for payment of Firemen's and Police Officers' Pension and
Relief Fund taxes for municipal fire and police relief and pension funds by
the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PENSION AND RELIEF FUNDS $75,000,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - MISCELLANEOUS FEDERAL PROGRAMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from any unanticipated Miscellaneous
Federal Program Funds received by the State of Arkansas or any of its
agencies which are deposited into the State Treasury, for transfer to state
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
agencies as provided by law for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MISCELLANEOUS FEDERAL GRANTS $2,000,000,000
(02) MISCELLANEOUS WORKFORCE INVESTMENT
PROGRAMS 100,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,100,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - DISASTER ASSISTANCE GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing
Officer, to be payable from the Disaster Assistance Fund, for provision of
disaster grants as authorized by the Disaster Relief Act of 1974 and for
complying with the Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973 (Arkansas Code 12-
75-101 et seq.) by the Office of Emergency Services for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DISASTER ASSISTANCE GRANTS $16,250,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION CLAIMS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Unemployment Compensation Trust
Fund, for paying unemployment compensation claims in accordance with the
Employment Security Amendments for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION $4,000,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - MARKETING AND REDISTRIBUTION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Property Sales Holding Fund, for
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
state agencies, counties, municipalities or other local governmental units
for expending or disbursing the net proceeds from property sold through the
Marketing and Redistribution Division of the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MARKETING AND REDISTRIBUTION PROGRAM $2,500,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - CHILD ABUSE/ RAPE/ DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
CONTRACT. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account,
for personal services reimbursement and expenses of the Child Abuse/ Rape/
Domestic Violence Section of the University of Arkansas - Medical Sciences by
the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PERSONAL SERVICES REIMBURSEMENT AND
EXPENSES $363,767

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - CHILD WELFARE RESTRUCTURING. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund
Account, for payment of contractual services by the Child Abuse/ Rape/
Domestic Violence Section of the University of Arkansas - Medical Sciences to
assist multi-disciplinary task coordinators throughout the state to review
and process child abuse complaints for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONTRACTUAL SERVICES $274,400

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - INFORMATION NETWORK OF ARKANSAS. There is
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be
payable from the Information Network of Arkansas Fund, for operating expenses
of the Information Network of Arkansas and other state government technology
initiatives approved by the Information Network of Arkansas Board by the
Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINTENANCE & OPERATIONS $1,000,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - ADMINISTRATION OF JUSTICE FUND. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be
payable from the State Administration of Justice Fund, for distribution to
state programs and agencies and reimbursement/ refunds to state, cities and
counties of court costs and filing fees remitted by the cities and counties
by the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STATE AGENCIES DISTRIBUTION $20,000,030
(02) REFUNDS-STATE/COUNTY/CITY 1,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $21,000,030

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS SHERIFFS' ASSOCIATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug
Abuse and Crime Prevention Program Fund, for grants to the Arkansas Sheriffs'
Association to be used for the establishment and operation of crime
prevention and alcohol and drug abuse programs and for a grant to the
Arkansas Sheriffs' Association to study ways to improve the administration of
sheriffs' offices and developing and improving educational programs in
Arkansas for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS SHERIFF'S ASSOCIATION $450,000

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION - DRUG ENFORCEMENT AND EDUCATION. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Special State Assets Forfeiture
Fund, for the purpose as defined by Arkansas Code § 5-64-505 for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DRUG ENFORCEMENT, EDUCATION,
TREATMENT AND RELATED PURPOSES $2,000,000

SECTION 15. APPROPRIATION - BABY SHARON ACT GRANTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing
Officer, to be payable from the Baby Sharon's Children's Catastrophic Illness
Grant Program Trust Fund, for grants to the Baby Sharon's Children's
Catastrophic Illness Grant Program Committee to assist with the medical
expenses incurred by families of children with catastrophic illnesses or
injuries by awarding grants to the families who are liable for the medical
expenses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) "BABY SHARON ACT" GRANTS $2,000,000

SECTION 16. APPROPRIATION - ORGAN DONATION EDUCATION GRANTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Organ Donation Trust Fund, for
grant funds to the Arkansas Regional Organ Recovery Agency, or its successor
agency, to be used for educational or informational materials and other
related costs to inform and educate the public about organ donations and
organ donation awareness for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ORGAN DONATION EDUCATION GRANTS $25,000

SECTION 17. APPROPRIATION - STATE EMPLOYEES BLANKET BOND PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration
- Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund,
for payment of blanket surety bond premiums for the State of Arkansas for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SURETY BOND PREMIUMS STATE EMPLOYEES $250,000

SECTION 18. APPROPRIATION - COUNTY PUBLIC EMPLOYEES BLANKET BOND
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the County Aid Fund,
for payment of blanket surety bond premiums for those counties participating
in the County Public Employees Blanket Bond Program for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SURETY BOND PREMIUMS COUNTY EMPLOYEES $500,000

SECTION 19. APPROPRIATION - MUNICIPAL PUBLIC EMPLOYEES BLANKET BOND
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Municipal Aid
Fund, for payment of blanket surety bond premiums for those municipalities
participating in the Municipal Public Employees Blanket Bond Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SURETY BOND PREMIUMS MUNICIPAL
EMPLOYEES $500,000
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202

SECTION 20. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES BLANKET BOND
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Division of
Elementary and Secondary Education Public School Fund Account, for payment of
blanket surety bond premiums for those school districts participating in the
Public School Employees Blanket Bond Program for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) SURETY BOND PREMIUMS PUBLIC SCHOOL
EMPLOYEES $250,000

SECTION 21. APPROPRIATION - FIRE PROTECTION SERVICES - ADDITIONAL
FUNDING. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration, to be payable from the Fire Protection Premium Tax Fund, for
additional funding of Arkansas fire departments as provided in Arkansas Code
beginning at 26-57-611 and including 26-57-614 and 14-284-101 et seq. by the
Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PAYMENTS TO FIRE DEPARTMENTS $25,000,000

SECTION 22. APPROPRIATION - WORK FORCE 2000. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Work Force 2000 Development Fund, for additional support for
vocational technical education and institutions of higher education by the
Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) TECHNICAL COLLEGES ACCREDITATION $30,000,000
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
(02) VO-TECH ACCREDITATION 5,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $35,000,000

SECTION 23. APPROPRIATION - JUVENILE DETENTION FACILITIES. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Juvenile Detention Facilities
Operating Fund, for grants for operating expenses of local juvenile detention
facilities for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) JUVENILE DETENTION FACILITIES
OPERATING EXPENSES $400,000

SECTION 24. APPROPRIATION - PURCHASE OF VEHICLES. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be payable
from the Motor Vehicle Acquisition Revolving Fund, for purchase of vehicles
as provided by Arkansas Code 22-8-201 by the Department of Finance and
Administration - Disbursing Officer for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PURCHASE OF VEHICLES $15,000,000

SECTION 25. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for miscellaneous
grants to Children's Hospital by the Department of Finance and Administration
- Disbursing Officer for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL BURN CENTER $1,000,000
(02) CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL INTENSIVE CARE 1,233,600
(03) CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL PAYMENTS 700,000
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
(04) CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL REPRODUCTIVE
HEALTH MONITORING 600,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,533,600

SECTION 26. APPROPRIATION - DFA - DISBURSING - MISCELLANEOUS - CASH -
TRANSFERS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for disbursement of cash funds collected on behalf of state
agencies for transfer to those agencies as necessary for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) VARIOUS EXPENSES $2,500,000

SECTION 27. APPROPRIATION - VARIOUS STATE AGENCIES - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from various state agency cash funds, for
providing various state agencies with appropriations for cash funds for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CASH APPROPRIATION-VARIOUS AGENCIES $350,000,000
(02) PAYPLAN ADJUSTMENT-VARIOUS AGENCIES 10,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $360,000,000

SECTION 28. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC LEGAL AID. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing
Officer, to be payable from the Public Legal Aid Fund, for providing grants
to Legal Aid of Arkansas and the Center for Arkansas Legal Services for
providing financial support for public legal aid organizations for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID-LEGAL AID OF ARKANSAS
AND THE CENTER FOR ARKANSAS LEGAL
SERVICES $641,574

SECTION 29. APPROPRIATION - PROSTATE CANCER. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing
Officer, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for
grants to the Arkansas Prostate Cancer Foundation for cancer detection and
research for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) AR PROSTATE CANCER FOUNDATION
GRANT-CANCER DETECTION AND RESEARCH $197,750

SECTION 30. APPROPRIATION - MULTI-JURISDICTIONAL DRUG CRIME TASK FORCE.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration
- Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the State Drug Crime Enforcement and
Prosecution Grant Fund, for State Drug Crime Enforcement and Prosecution
grant awards, operating and administrative expenses of the Multi-
Jurisdictional Drug Crime Task Force for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) STATE DRUG CRIME ENFORCEMENT AND
PROSECUTION GRANT AWARDS $5,000,000
(02) OPERATING AND ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES 500,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $5,500,000

SECTION 31. APPROPRIATION - VARIOUS STATE AGENCIES MEDICAL MARIJUANA
IMPLEMENTATION AND REGULATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable
from various state and federal balances, for providing various state agencies
with appropriations to cover anticipated and unanticipated expenses resulting
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
from the implementation and regulation of medical marijuana for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MEDICAL MARIJUANA IMPLEMENTATION AND
REGULATION-VARIOUS AGENCIES $5,000,000

SECTION 32. APPROPRIATION - VARIOUS TEMPORARY APPROPRIATION FOR STATE
AGENCIES AND INSTITUTIONS. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department
of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous State Treasury Funds, for providing various state agencies and
institutions with additional appropriation for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ADDITIONAL APPROPRIATION - VARIOUS
AGENCIES AND INSTITUTIONS $350,000,000

SECTION 33. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS AGRICULTURAL MARKETING GRANTS.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration
- Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Arkansas Agricultural Marketing
Grants Fund, for grants to wineries as provided by Arkansas Code 3-5-901 et
seq., for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) ARKANSAS AGRICULTURAL MARKETING GRANTS $600,000

SECTION 34. APPROPRIATION - C.A.R.E.S. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be
payable from various funds, for providing various state agencies,
constitutional offices, and institutions with additional appropriation for
expenses associated with providing emergency assistance and health care
response for those affected by the 2020 coronavirus pandemic, for the fiscal
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) C.A.R.E.S. APPROPRIATION $5,000,000

SECTION 35. APPROPRIATION - AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from various funds, for providing various
state agencies, constitutional offices, and institutions with appropriation
for any expenses associated with the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FEDERAL FUNDS AWARDED DIRECTLY TO
AGENCIES, DEPARTMENTS, INSTITUTIONS,
CITIES AND COUNTIES $2,000,000,000
(02) FEDERAL FUNDS AWARDED TO AGENCIES,
DEPARTMENTS, INSTITUTIONS, CITIES,
AND COUNTIES 1,000,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $3,000,000,000

SECTION 36. APPROPRIATION - INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT & JOBS ACT OF
2021. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and
Administration - Disbursing Officer, to be payable from various funds, for
providing various state agencies, constitutional offices, and institutions
with appropriation for any expenses associated with the Infrastructure
Investment & Jobs Act of 2021 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FEDERAL FUNDS AWARDED TO AGENCIES,
DEPARTMENTS, INSTITUTIONS, CITIES AND
COUNTIES $3,500,000,000
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202

SECTION 37. APPROPRIATION - PREGNANCY HELP ORGANIZATION GRANTS. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund
Account, for grants for the Pregnancy Help Organizations for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) PREGNANCY HELP ORGANIZATION GRANTS $2,000,000

SECTION 38. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PREGNANCY
HELP ORGANIZATION GRANTS.
(a)(1) As used in this section, "pregnancy help organization" means a
nonprofit corporation or an organization exempt from federal income tax,
existing as of January 1, 2024, that:
(A) Seeks to provide a range of services to individuals facing an
unintended pregnancy with the intention of encouraging pregnant women to give
birth to their unborn children;
(B) Promotes infant and maternal wellness and/or reduces infant and
maternal mortality, by:
i) Providing nutritional information and/or nutritional counseling;
ii) Providing prenatal vitamins;
iii) Providing a list of prenatal medical care options;
iv) Providing social, emotional, and/or material support; or
v) Providing referrals for WIC and community-based nutritional services,
including but not limited to food banks, food pantries, and food distribution
centers; and
(C) Does not perform, prescribe, provide referrals for, or encourage
abortion or affiliate with any organization that performs, prescribes,
provides referrals for, or encourages abortion.
(2) As used in this section, a "pregnancy help organization" includes
without limitation:
(A) Organizations traditionally known as "crisis pregnancy organizations";
(B) Maternity homes;
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
(C) Adoption agencies; and
(D) Social services agencies that provide material support and other
assistance to individuals facing an unintended pregnancy to help those
individuals give birth to their unborn children.
(b)(1) The Department of Finance and Administration shall create a grant
program to provide funding to pregnancy help organizations.
(2) Grant funds shall be disbursed directly to the pregnancy help
organizations from the Department of Finance and Administration.
(c)(1) The department shall promulgate rules to implement the disbursement of
the grant moneys from the Pregnancy Help Organization Grant Sub-Fund in the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account.
(2) The rules shall include:
(A) A requirement that the entity requesting the grant monies submit a
plan describing how the entity will spend the grant moneys; and
(B) A statement that the funds shall not be disbursed all at once, but
in increments in accordance with the plan described in subdivision (c)(2)(A)
of this section.
(d) Each fiscal year the Department of Finance and Administration shall
file with the Legislative Council or, if the General Assembly is in session,
the Joint Budget Committee, a report summarizing the amount of all funding
given to each Pregnancy Help Organization and the purpose of the funds
awarded to each Pregnancy Help Organization.
(e) The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025, through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 39. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - APPROPRIATION – INFRASTRUCTURE INVESTMENT & JOBS ACT OF 2021.
(i) All appropriation and expenditures for funding received for the
Infrastructure Investment & Jobs Act of 2021 shall be expended using the
Infrastructure Investment & Jobs Act of 2021 appropriation sections as
authorized in this Act.
(ii) Any state agency, constitutional office, or institution shall request
a transfer of appropriation, as provided in the Infrastructure Investment &
Jobs Act of 2021 appropriation sections of this Act, from the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, stating clearly the amount requested, purpose and any
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
additional information requested by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(iii) After reviewing a request, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
deny, modify or approve the request based on the estimated amount of
appropriation needed and currently available, purpose, estimated funding
available and preferred spending priority. Upon approval or modification of a
request by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and after meeting the
requirements of subsection (iv) herein, the Department of Finance and
Administration shall establish the transfer of appropriation on the books of
the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Auditor, in
compliance with the applicable classifications of appropriations as
enumerated in Arkansas Code 19-4-521 through 19-4-525.
(iv) Any request approved as authorized in subsection (iii) herein,
including requests that establish a new commitment item or new appropriation
shall require prior approval by the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget
Committee during a regular session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session
of the General Assembly.
(v) Any Oversight and/or Steering Committee charged with overseeing
disbursement of funds and appropriation from funds received from the
Infrastructure Investment & Jobs Act of 2021 appropriation sections of this
Act shall coordinate with the Department of Finance and Administration as
needed to facilitate the approval requirements herein in a timely manner.
(vi) Any appropriation approved in the Infrastructure Investment & Jobs Act
of 2021 by the General Assembly shall only be used for:
1) The purpose and amount of planned expenditures as submitted for
approval to the General Assembly and,
2) In the event that expenditures or obligations do not fully expend
approved appropriation authority as authorized in this section, the excess
appropriation may not be utilized for any additional expenditures other than
the amount and purpose as submitted to and approved by the General Assembly.
(vii) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall submit a monthly report
to the Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee during a regular
session, fiscal session, or extraordinary session of the General Assembly or
to a designated subcommittee listing all Infrastructure Investment & Jobs Act
of 2021 beginning balance of funds received, each appropriation approved as
authorized in subsection (v) herein with the date the appropriation is
established, state entity, purpose, amount, funding distributed, and
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
remaining balance.
(viii) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation each fiscal year is
the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s). Further, the General
Assembly has determined that a state agency, constitutional office, or
institution may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to
the state agency, constitutional office, or institution authorizing broad
powers under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate
that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this
section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
for approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.

SECTION 40. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - APPROPRIATION – AMERICAN RESCUE PLAN ACT OF 2021. (i) All
appropriation and expenditures for funding received for the American Rescue
Plan Act of 2021 shall be expended using the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
Appropriation Sections as authorized in this Act.
(ii) Any state agency, constitutional office, or institution shall request
a transfer of appropriation, as provided in the American Rescue Plan Act of
2021 Appropriation Sections of this Act, from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, stating clearly the amount requested, purpose and any additional
information requested by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(iii) After reviewing a request, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
deny, modify or approve the request based on the estimated amount of
appropriation needed and currently available, purpose, estimated funding
available and preferred spending priority. Upon approval or modification of a
request by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and after meeting the
requirements of subsection (iv) herein, the Department of Finance and
Administration shall establish the transfer of appropriation on the books of
the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Auditor, in
compliance with the applicable classifications of appropriations as
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
enumerated in Arkansas Code 19-4-521 through 19-4-525.
(iv) Any request approved as authorized in subsection (iii) herein,
including requests that establish a new commitment item or new appropriation
shall require prior approval by the Legislative Council during the extended
recess, beginning on May 1, 2021, of the 2021 Regular Session or during the
interim, or the Joint Budget Committee during a regular session, fiscal
session, or extraordinary session of the General Assembly.
(v) Any Oversight and/or Steering Committee charged with overseeing
disbursement of funds and appropriation from funds received from the American
Rescue Plan Act of 2021 Appropriation Sections of this Act shall coordinate
with the Department of Finance and Administration as needed to facilitate the
approval requirements herein in a timely manner.
(vi) Any appropriation approved in the American Rescue Plan of 2021 by the
General Assembly shall only be used for:
(1) The purpose and amount of planned expenditures as submitted for
approval to the General Assembly and,
(2) In the event that expenditures or obligations do not fully expend
approved appropriation authority as authorized in this section, the excess
appropriation may not be utilized for any additional expenditures other than
the amount and purpose as submitted to and approved by the General Assembly.
(vii) It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds received from the
American Rescue Plan of 2021 that are discretionary or are not required to be
spent for a different general or specific purpose may be considered to be
utilized to pay off existing debt service. The parameters for the selection
of debt service payments may consider the highest interest rate owed and with
priority given to the payment of Big River Steel General Obligations bonds
and GARVEE Department of Transportation bonds.
(viii) The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall submit a monthly report
biannually, July 15th and January 15th, to the Legislative Council during
the extended recess, beginning on May 1, 2021, of the 2021 Regular Session or
during the interim, or the Joint Budget Committee during a regular session,
fiscal session, or extraordinary session of the General Assembly or to a
designated subcommittee listing all American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
beginning balance of funds received, each appropriation approved as
authorized in subsection (v) herein with the date the appropriation is
established, state entity, purpose, amount, funding distributed, and
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
remaining balance. A final report shall be filed six months after the last
expenditure and the report shall be sunset.
(ix) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation each fiscal year is
the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by
delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s). Further, the General
Assembly has determined that a state agency, constitutional office, or
institution may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to
the state agency, constitutional office, or institution authorizing broad
powers under this section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate
that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of
the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this
section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement
or approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled
unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is
void.


SECTION 41. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - APPROPRIATION – C.A.R.E.S. (i) In the event that sufficient
appropriation is not provided by the General Assembly, any state agency,
constitutional office, or institution may request a transfer of
appropriation, as provided in the C.A.R.E.S. Appropriation Section of this
Act, from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, stating clearly the amount
requested, purpose and any additional information requested by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State.
(ii) After reviewing a request, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may deny,
modify or approve the request based on the estimated amount of appropriation
needed and currently available, purpose, estimated funding available and
preferred spending priority. Upon approval or modification of a request by the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and after meeting the requirements of
subsection (iii) herein, the Department of Finance and Administration shall
establish the transfer of appropriation on the books of the Department of
Finance and Administration and the State Auditor, in compliance with the
applicable classifications of appropriations as enumerated in Arkansas Code 19-
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
4-521 through 19-4-525.
(iii) Any request approved as authorized in subsection (ii) herein, including
requests that establish a new commitment item or new appropriation shall
require prior approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or if meeting in
Regular or Fiscal Session the Joint Budget Committee.
(iv) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation each fiscal year is the
prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating
such maximums in the appropriation act(s). Further, the General Assembly has
determined that a state agency, constitutional office, or institution may
operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the state agency,
constitutional office, or institution authorizing broad powers under this
section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General
Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement
of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a
severable part of this section. If the requirement or approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a
court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect from the date of passage
through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 42. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CLASSIFICATION AND USE OF APPROPRIATIONS. The appropriations authorized in
the Marketing and Redistribution Section, hereof which are transferred to the
various agencies, as authorized in the Transfer Provision - Marketing and
Redistribution Section hereof, are to be used for the maintenance and general
operation of the benefiting agency and shall only be expended under the
provisions cited in Arkansas Code § 19-4-522, the same being the General
Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law of Arkansas. Provided, however, no
appropriation authorized herein shall be expended for Conference and Travel
Expenses or Professional Fees and Services.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 43. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROVISION - MARKETING AND REDISTRIBUTION. The Department of Finance and
Administration shall, upon transfer to the agencies or institutions fund or
fund account of the proceeds derived from disposal of property by the
Marketing and Redistribution division for the benefit of various agencies,
transfer appropriation, as provided in the Marketing and Redistribution
Section, hereof in such amount as funds are deposited into the Property Sales
Holding Fund and transferred therefrom for the benefit of such agencies.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 44. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
RESTRICTIONS - MISCELLANEOUS TRANSFERS. Nothing in this Act is to be
construed as an authority to transfer a like amount of current general
revenues to fund appropriations provided for in the Miscellaneous Transfers
Section of this Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 45. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
RESTRICTIONS - TRANSFER PROVISIONS. The Department of Finance and
Administration shall transfer appropriation as provided in the Refund to
Expenditures line item of the Miscellaneous Transfers Section, hereof in such
amounts as funds are deposited into the State Treasury or financial
institutions for proceeds received from insurance policies for casualty
losses, overpayment of obligations, overpayment of salaries, over-allocation
of federal assistance, maturity or redemption of investments, and subrogation
payments received for workers' compensation claims paid, for the benefit of
various state agencies. Provided, however, that the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State is hereby authorized to promulgate such rules, regulations,
procedures, and guidelines as he or she may deem necessary and proper in
order to carry out the provisions of this Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202

SECTION 46. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - PERSONAL SERVICES OVERTIME. In the event that there is not
sufficient appropriation provided for by the General Assembly for overtime
compensation pursuant to Arkansas Code § 19-4-1612 and related personal
services matching for any state agency for the period ending June 30, 2025
2026, said agency shall request a transfer from appropriations provided for
Overtime in the Miscellaneous Transfers Section, herein, from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, stating clearly the amount required. Upon
approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, and after seeking prior
review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, the
State Auditor shall be notified as to the amount and the purposes for which
said appropriation is to be made. The appropriation shall be established
upon the books of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State
Auditor. Provided, further, that if desired, said appropriation shall be
supplemental to those regularly appropriated for such purposes by the General
Assembly for that agency.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 47. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
CLASSIFICATION AND USE OF APPROPRIATIONS - REFUND TO EXPENDITURES. The
appropriations authorized for Refund to Expenditures in the Miscellaneous
Transfers Section, hereof which are transferred to the various agencies as
authorized by the RESTRICTIONS - MISCELLANEOUS TRANSFERS and the RESTRICTIONS
- TRANSFER POSITIONS Sections hereof are to be used for the same purposes and
shall be expended under the same provisions as cited in Arkansas Code §§ 19-
4-501 through 19-4-527, the same being the General Accounting and Budgetary
Procedures Law of Arkansas, or its successor.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 48. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
PROCEDURES - CASH FUNDS. In the event that the appropriation is not provided
by the General Assembly for Cash Fund expenditures for any state agency,
pursuant to Arkansas Code § 19-4-801 et seq., said agency shall request a
transfer of appropriation from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, stating
clearly the amount required. Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, and after seeking prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council
or Joint Budget Committee, said cash fund appropriations shall be established
upon the books of the Department of Finance and Administration, provided
further, that upon request of the state agency and with the approval of the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the requested appropriations may be
established upon the books of the Department of Finance and Administration in
compliance with the applicable classifications of appropriations as
enumerated in Arkansas Code §§ 19-4-521 through 19-4-527.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 49. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
MISCELLANEOUS FEDERAL PROGRAMS. The appropriations provided in the Various
State Agencies - Cash Section herein shall not be used to establish spending
authority for new or unanticipated Federal Funds or Programs as defined by
the provisions of the Miscellaneous Federal Grant Programs Act, Arkansas Code
§ 19-7-501 et seq., and the provisions of the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Act, Arkansas Code § 19-4-101 et seq., or its successor.
Funds subject to the above mentioned acts shall be deposited in the State
Treasury.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 50. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SALARIES.
No provisions as provided in the Various State Agencies - Cash Section herein
shall be interpreted as the authority to create or establish new positions in
addition to the positions established in the agency's Appropriation Act. In
addition, salaries paid from appropriations transferred herein shall be
subject to the provision of the Regular Salaries Procedures and Restrictions
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
Act.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 51. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - PERSONAL SERVICES AND REGULAR SALARIES. In the event that the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State determines that the General Assembly has
not provided sufficient appropriation for the payment of Personal Services
for any office of an elected Constitutional Officer, including the Bureau of
Legislative Research, Division of Legislative Audit or the Judicial
Department, any state agency, office, board, commission, institution or
institution of higher education due to the enactment of this Act or any other
Act approved by the General Assembly which raises the compensation level or
required benefit matching costs of state employees, the agency, office,
board, commission, institution of higher education or other institution may
request a transfer from the appropriation provided herein from the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State. Such request shall clearly state the amount
required, the fund or fund account from which the employees are currently
being paid, and such other information as may be required by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State that he or she deems necessary to make a decision
regarding the request. Upon the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, and upon review by the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review
Subcommittee of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee or
upon processing the request for elected Constitutional Officers and their
employees by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the State Auditor shall
be notified as to the amount and the purposes for which said appropriation is
to be made. In the event that appropriation for the payment of Personal
Services is not sufficient for the last payroll of the fiscal year, the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State may approve any transfers on an emergency basis
and provide a report to the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review
Subcommittee of the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee.
The appropriation shall then be added to the proper account on the books of
the Department of Finance and Administration and the State Auditor payable
from the fund or fund account from which the employees of the state agency,
office, board, commission, institution of higher education or other
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
institution are authorized to be paid by law. Such appropriation transfers
shall be limited to Regular Salaries or Personal Services Matching or both.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 52. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUNDING
TRANSFER - PERFORMANCE FUND. Funding of compensation increases provided by
the General Assembly in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026, and
funding for the appropriation transfers authorized by the TRANSFER PROCEDURES
- PERSONAL SERVICES AND REGULAR SALARIES Section of this Act for those state
agencies, offices, boards, commissions, institutions and state institutions
of higher education which are supported in whole or in part from general
revenues shall, if required, be provided for by a transfer from the
Performance Fund to the proper fund or fund account and in such amounts as
may be determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and upon review by
the Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review Subcommittee of the
Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee. The state agencies,
offices, boards, commissions, institutions and state institutions of higher
education shall, in addition to the funds provided in this section for
Personal Services from the Performance Fund, make available any funding
generated from its salary savings for such purposes as provided for herein,
from the funds or fund accounts as prescribed by law.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 53. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PUBLIC
DEFENDER. The appropriation provided in the Public Defender Reimbursement
line item of the Miscellaneous Grants and Expenses Section herein shall be
expended only for the purpose of reimbursing the Public Defender of Pulaski
County to provide defense for the mentally ill.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 54. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. SHERIFFS'
ASSOCIATION. A lump sum monthly installment of at least one-twelfth (1/12)
of the annual allocation provided for in the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association
Section of this Act, or so much thereof as may be made available, shall be
provided to the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association to be used exclusively for the
establishment and operation of crime prevention and alcohol and drug abuse
programs and for a grant to the Arkansas Sheriffs' Association to study ways
to improve the administration of sheriffs' offices and developing and
improving education programs designed for sheriffs' offices in Arkansas.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 55. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DISTRIBUTION OF ADMINISTRATION OF JUSTICE FUNDS. In the event that the fund
balance in the Administration of Justice Fund is inadequate to fund the
monthly allocation to State Agencies, the funds will be distributed as
follows:
(a) The available revenue and remaining State Administration of Justice
Fund balance shall be distributed first to fully fund the monthly allocations
found in the ALLOCATION RESTRICTIONS Section of this Act for:
(1) the Administrative Office of the Courts to fund the State Central
Services Fund for Trial Court Administrators,
(2) the District Judges Association for the District Court Coordinator,
and
(3) Administrative Office of the Courts to fund State Central Services
Fund for Court Reporters.
(b) The total funds remaining in the State Administration of Justice Fund
after the monthly distribution is made under subdivision (a) of this section
shall be distributed to the remaining state programs and state agencies
listed in the ALLOCATION RESTRICTIONS Section of this Act but not listed in
subdivision (a) of this section shall be funded in the percentage of the
total funds available in the Administration of Justice Fund; that is if less
than 100% of the total monthly allocation is available for distribution,
monthly allocations for the remaining agencies will be funded at an equal
percentage consistent with the remaining available funds, provided that any
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
of the allocations listed in the ALLOCATION RESTRICTIONS Section that have
been fully pledged prior to January 1, 2001 to the repayment of a bond issue
or bond issues shall not be reduced below the amount listed in the ALLOCATION
RESTRICTIONS Section of this Act. Any shortage from one month will be
adjusted in future months' payments as funds become available.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 56. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ALLOCATION RESTRICTIONS. There is hereby allocated to state programs and
agencies, as set out herein, the following allocations of funds appropriated
for State Agencies Distribution Item in the Administration of Justice Fund
Section, to the Department of Finance and Administration - Disbursing
Officer, there to be used as provided by law.
Maximum Allocation
Item Fiscal Years
No. 2024-2025 2025-2026
(1) Board of Trustees of the University of
Arkansas for the purpose and as regulated
by §§ 6-64-604 through 6-64-606 $2,687,619$2,754,647
(2) Drug Abuse Prevention and Treatment
Fund for use in the Drug Abuse Prevention
and Treatment Program of the Bureau of
Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention 342,000
(3) Highway Safety Special Fund for programs
of the Arkansas Highway Safety Program
within DHS 1,324,795
(4) Division of Arkansas State Police for
the State Police Retirement Fund 1,499,256
(5) Division of Arkansas State Police Fund 400,000
(6) Crime Victims/Reparations Revolving Fund
for the purpose and as regulated by
Arkansas Code Annotated § 16-90-701 et seq. 2,089,723
(7) Prosecutor Coordinator's Office for
deposit in the Law Enforcement and
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
Prosecutor Drug Enforcement Training Fund 70,660
(8) Crime Information System Fund 98,064
(9) Justice Building Construction Fund 990,000
(10) District Court Judge and the
District Court Clerk Education Fund 100,000
(11) Arkansas Judicial Retirement System Fund 902,797
(12) State Central Services Fund for the
benefit of the Public Defender Commission 6,908,027
(13) State Central Services Fund for
Administrative Office of the Courts - Court
Reporters 6,075,374
(14) Justice Building Fund 83,528
(15) Arkansas Counties Alcohol and Drug
Abuse and Crime Prevention Fund 50,000
(16) State Central Services Fund for
Administrative Office of the Courts -
Trial Court Administrators 8,312,527
(17) Drug Abuse Prevention and Treatment
Fund for use in the Drug Abuse Prevention
and Treatment program of the Bureau of
Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention 312,000
(18) State Central Services Fund for the
Benefit of the Administrative Office
of the Courts Div. of Dependency-Neglect
Representation 4,284,838
(19) Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account for
the benefit of the State Crime Laboratory 576,988
(20) District Judges Association for the
District Court Coordinator 67,028
(21) Public Legal Aid Fund 855,432
(22) Administrative Office of the Courts –
County Reimbursements for Jurors 850,000
(23) Administrative Office of the Courts -
Drug Court Coordinator to reimburse the
State Central Services Fund 66,320
(24) State Central Services Fund for Court
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
Security by Administrative Office of the
Courts 362,791
TOTAL AMOUNT ALLOCATED $39,309,767
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 57. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. YEARLY
FUND TRANSFERS. On July 1, 2010 and each July 1, thereafter, if the fund
balance of the Crime Victims Reparation Revolving Fund falls below one
million dollars ($1,000,000), the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
transfer on his or her books and those of the State Treasurer and the Auditor
of the State a sum not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) or so much
thereof as is available from fund balances that exceed seven million dollars
($7,000,000) as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, from the
State Administration of Justice Fund to the Crime Victims Reparations
Revolving Fund to provide funds for personal services, operating expenses and
claims for the Office of the Attorney General - Crime Victims Reparations
Program.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 58. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. WORK
FORCE 2000 DISTRIBUTION. After the amount to be made available to a
technical college, technical institute or comprehensive lifelong learning
center has been determined, as provided by law, the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State shall process the documents necessary so that the funds may be
transferred from the Work Force 2000 Development Fund to the State Treasury
fund or fund account from which the technical college, technical institute,
or comprehensive lifelong learning center draws its general revenue support.
The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall also cause an equal amount of the
appropriation provided for Technical Colleges Accreditation and Vo-Tech
Accreditation in the Work Force 2000 Section of this Act to be transferred to
the institutions' appropriate line item appropriation or allocation, there to
be supplemental and in addition to those appropriations or allocations
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
provided by the General Assembly for personal services and operating expenses
of the institution from the State Treasury Fund or fund account.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 59. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. JUVENILE
DETENTION FACILITIES - ALLOCATION. There is hereby allocated to the local
juvenile detention facilities, as set out herein, the following amounts as
appropriated to the Department of Finance and Administration – Disbursing
Officer for grants for operating expenses of local juvenile detention
facilities for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025 2026:
Maximum Allocation
Item Fiscal Years
No. Juvenile Detention Facility 2024-2025 2025-2026
(01) Arkansas County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(02) Benton County Juvenile Detention Center 22,082
(03) Craighead County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(04) Crittenden County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(05) Faulkner County Juvenile Detention Center 20,783
(06) Garland County Juvenile Detention Center 28,574
(07) Independence County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(08) Jefferson County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(09) Miller County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(10) Mississippi County Juvenile Detention Center 16,891
(11) Pulaski County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(12) Sebastian County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(13) Washington County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
(14) Yell County Juvenile Detention Center 31,167
Total Amount Allocated $ 400,000
The amount of funds distributed to the local juvenile detention facilities
shall be adjusted as necessary on a pro-rata basis depending upon the actual
amount of funding provided for this purpose in each fiscal year. If during
the fiscal year any of the Juvenile Detention Facilities ceases operations,
the facilities' remaining funds will be distributed to the remaining Juvenile
Detention Facilities in a proportional basis.
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 60. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
OF FUNDS FOR THE PROGRAM - CA/R/DV - UAMS. The Department of Human Services
may provide funding in an amount not to exceed $300,000 for each fiscal year
for expansion of services by the Child Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Section
of the University of Arkansas – Medical Sciences. The Secretary of the
Department of Human Services shall certify the amount of available funds for
this purpose for each year. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall
transfer the amount of certified funds available from an account designated
by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services to the Miscellaneous
Agencies Fund Account to expand services provided by the Child
Abuse/Rape/Domestic Violence Section of the University of Arkansas – Medical
Sciences.
T The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 61. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. STATE’S
CONTRIBUTIONS. The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
is authorized to transfer Appropriation and Funding between State’s
Contributions line items authorized in the State's Contributions Section.
Any unexpended balances in funds provided for State’s Contributions in this
Act remaining June 30, 2024 2025, shall be carried forward during the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2025 2026.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 62. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - PERSONAL SERVICES STIPENDS. If there is not sufficient
appropriation, from funds deposited in the State Treasury or Cash Accounts of
an agency, for personal services, or personal services matching for any state
agency for the period ending June 30, 2025 2026, for State agencies that
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
process payroll through the Arkansas Administrative Statewide Information
System for federal and state tax reporting as necessary to comply with the
payment of stipends under United States Internal Revenue Code (IRC), 2001-
Code-Vol, Sec 3401 and Treasury Regulations §31.3401(c)-1(a) and §1.1402(c)-
2(b), and others which govern the reporting of income and payment of
withholding and matching taxes for personal services, the agency shall
request a transfer from appropriation provided for Personal Services and
Personal Services Matching in the appropriation for Various State Agencies -
U.S. IRC and Treasury Regulations herein, from the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, stating clearly the amounts required for each item. Upon approval
of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the State Auditor shall be notified
as to the amount and the purposes for which the appropriation is to be made
and such appropriation as needed shall be established upon the books of the
Department of Finance and Administration and the State Auditor. Provided,
however, that in the event the total amount of transfer requested in any
fiscal year exceeds Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000), the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State shall seek prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee before the transfer shall be made.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 63. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. POSITION
ESTABLISHMENT. The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall have the authority
to establish such positions as necessary for State agencies to process
payroll through the Arkansas Administrative Statewide Information System for
federal and state tax reporting purposes as necessary to comply with the
United States Internal Revenue Code (IRC), 2001-Code-Vol, Sec 3401 and
Treasury Regulations §31.3401(c)-1(a) and §1.1402(c)-2(b), and others which
govern the reporting of income and payment of withholding and matching taxes
for personal services. The positions established shall not be considered as
part of the total number of authorized positions for an agency and shall only
be considered as placeholders for payments to individuals who are board or
commission members or elected officials of the State that do not otherwise
receive salaries or wages as defined in Arkansas Code § 19-4-521 for their
personal services. Further, none of the positions established under this
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
section shall imply eligibility for state retirement or state health
insurance benefits. The establishment of such positions shall not exceed 250
positions in any fiscal year.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 64. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
AUTHORIZED - ARKANSAS CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL. The Arkansas Children's Hospital
may request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to transfer funds made
available for the following by this Act sums not to exceed $1,000,000 for the
Arkansas Children's Hospital Burn Center, $700,000 for the Children's
Hospital Payments, $600,000 for the Reproductive Health Monitoring, and
$233,600 for the Intensive Care Nursery each fiscal year from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account to the Department of Human Services
Grants Fund Account. The transferred funds shall be used to match federal
funds used for supplemental Medicaid payments to Arkansas Children's
Hospital.
The Arkansas Children's Hospital may also request the Chief Fiscal Officer
of the State to transfer the sum not to exceed $1,000,000 each fiscal year
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account from funds made available by
this Act for the Intensive Care Nursery to the Department of Human Services
Grants Fund Account. The transferred funds shall be used to match federal
Medicaid funds for cost-based reimbursement for helicopter patient transport.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 65. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
INNOVATION AND PROJECT DEVELOPMENT FUND TRANSFERS. The Department of
Transformation & Shared Services - Division of Information Systems is a cost
recovery agency subject to the requirements of the United States Office of
Management and Budget Circular A-87 Cost Principles for State, Local and
Indian Tribal Government (A-87) and Cost Principles for Developing Cost
Allocation Plans and Indirect Cost Rates for Agreements with the Federal
Government Implementation Guide for the Office of Management and Budget
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
Circular A-87 (ASMBC-10). To comply with these federal rules, it is necessary
to establish an Innovation and Project Development appropriation and general
revenue fund account within the Department of Finance and Administration -
Disbursing Officer for the Department of Transformation & Shared Services -
Division of Information Systems. This fund shall be used for state enterprise
innovation projects that would enhance the technology operations of the State
that cannot be cost allocated to federal programs. The Department of
Transformation & Shared Services - Division of Information Systems will
maintain documentation for projects billed for these purposes. Fund transfers
may be made from the General Revenue Fund Account, upon the approval of the
Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and prior review of the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee, to reimburse the Department of
Transformation & Shared Services - Division of Information Systems for the
amounts billed.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 66. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES – PERSONAL SERVICES EXTRA HELP. In the event that there is not
sufficient appropriation provided for by the General Assembly for payment of
personal services related to Extra Help for any state agency for the period
ending June 30, 2025 2026, said agency may request a transfer from
appropriations provided for Personal Services Extra Help in the Miscellaneous
Transfers Section herein, from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, stating
clearly the amount required. Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, and after seeking prior review by the Arkansas Legislative Council
or Joint Budget Committee, the State Auditor shall be notified as to the
amount and the purposes for which said appropriation is to be made. The
appropriation shall then be established upon the books of the Department of
Finance and Administration and the State Auditor. Provided further, that if
desired, said appropriation shall be supplemental to those regularly
appropriated for such purposes by the General Assembly for the agency.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
SECTION 67. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
INTRASTATE METRO PLANNING GRANTS. As referenced in Section 9 of Act 637 of
1995, the authorized funding for Intrastate Metro Planning Grants that are
evenly distributed among planning and development districts under the
Miscellaneous Grants and Expenses Section of this Act shall include the West
Central Arkansas Economic Development District.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 68. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
USAGE AUTHORIZED. The Arkansas Children’s Hospital President and C.E.O. may
request the Department of Human Services-Division of Medical Services to
retain in the Department of Human Services Grant Fund account an amount not
to exceed $1,000,000 for funds made available by the act to be used to match
federal funds used for supplemental Medicaid payments to Arkansas Children’s
Hospital.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 69. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - MEDICAL MARIJUANA IMPLEMENTATION AND REGULATION. In the event
that sufficient appropriation is not provided by the General Assembly for
expenditures resulting from the implementation and regulation of the Arkansas
Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 for any state agency, pursuant to
Arkansas Code § 19-4-701 et seq., said agency shall request a transfer of
appropriation from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, stating clearly the
amount required. Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State said
appropriations shall be established upon the books of the Department of
Finance and Administration in compliance with the applicable classifications
of appropriations as enumerated in Arkansas Code §§ 19-4-521 through 19-4-
527.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202

SECTION 70. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. FUND
TRANSFER AUTHORITY. From time to time, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State
may transfer from his or her books and those of the Treasurer of State and
the Auditor of State from the Medical Marijuana Implementation and Operations
Fund to various state agencies' funds the amounts necessary to fund the
expenses for the implementation, administration, and/or enforcement of the
Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 71. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. BLANKET
BOND PROGRAM. The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
is authorized to transfer Appropriation between the Blanket Surety Bond
Program appropriations authorized for State Employees (Appropriation 2DM),
County Employees (Appropriation 2DN), Municipal Employees (Appropriation 2DP)
and Public School Employees (Appropriation 2DQ).
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 72. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFER
PROCEDURES - VARIOUS TEMPORARY APPROPRIATION FOR STATE AGENCIES AND
INSTITUTIONS. (i) In the event that sufficient appropriation is not provided
by the General Assembly for any state agency or institution, an agency or
institution may request a transfer of appropriation, as provided in the
Various Temporary Appropriation for State Agencies and Institutions
Appropriation Section of this Act, from the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, stating clearly the amount requested, purpose and any additional
information requested by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.
(ii) After reviewing a request the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State may
deny, modify or approve the agencies or institutions request based on the
estimated amount of appropriation needed and currently available, purpose,
estimated funding available and preferred spending priority. Upon approval
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
or modification of a request by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and
after meeting the requirements of subsection (iii) herein, the Department of
Finance and Administration shall establish the transfer of appropriation on
the books of the Department of Finance and Administration and the State
Auditor, in compliance with the applicable classifications of appropriations
as enumerated in Arkansas Code 19-4-521 through 19-4-525.
(iii) Any request approved as authorized in subsection (ii) herein,
including requests that establish a new commitment item or new appropriation
shall require prior approval by the Arkansas Legislative Council or if
meeting in Regular or Fiscal Session the Joint Budget Committee.
(iv) Any appropriation approved as authorized in this Section shall not be
carried forward to the next fiscal year and shall be identified as a change
level increase by the state agency or institution, if requested.
(v) Determining the maximum amount of appropriation for a state agency or
institution each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly.
This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the
appropriation act(s) for a state agency or institution. Further, the General
Assembly has determined that a state agency or institution may operate more
efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the state agency or
institution authorizing broad powers under this section. Therefore, it is
both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight
by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget
Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this
section. If the requirement or approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent
jurisdiction, this entire section is void.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 73. SPECIAL LANGUAGE — CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code § 19-6-803(c),
concerning the Public Legal Aid Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The fund shall be used for providing financial support for public
legal aid organizations and distributed as follows:
(1) Forty-five percent (45%) of the fund shall be paid to Legal
Aid of Arkansas; and
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
(2) Fifty-five percent (55%) of the fund shall be paid to the
Center for Arkansas Legal Services.

SECTION 74. SPECIAL LANGUAGE — CODE AMENDMENT. Arkansas Code Title 19,
Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is amended to add an additional section to read as
follows:
19-5-1288. Drug Task Force Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the "Drug Task Force Fund."
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys obtained from public or private grants or other
sources that are designated to be credited to the fund; and
(2) Any other revenues authorized by law.
(c) The moneys in the fund shall be used to distribute funds to all
drug task forces in the state that meet the eligibility criteria for a
disbursement and shall be disbursed to eligible drug task forces in the state
by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.
(d) To be eligible to receive a disbursement from the fund, a drug
task force shall:
(1) Meet the standards of the Arkansas Commission on Law
Enforcement Standards and Training;
(2) Provide an annual accounting of its seizures and arrests to
the Department of Finance and Administration; and
(3) Meet any additional standards established by the department
by rule under subsection (e) of this section.
(e) The department shall promulgate rules to implement this section,
including without limitation:
(1) Additional eligibility criteria, in consultation with the
Office of Prosector Coordinator and Drug Task Force Board, for a drug task
force to be eligible to receive a disbursement from the fund; and
(2) The process for a drug task force to submit eligibility
documentation for a disbursement, including without limitation documentation
illustrating eligibility under subsection (d) of this section.

SECTION 75. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008

As Engrossed: H3/12/25 H4/1/25 H4/10/25 HB1202
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 76. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 77. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 73 of this act is effective on
and after January 1, 2026.

SECTION 78. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act, except for Section 73, on July 1, 2025 is
essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this
Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative
session, the delay in the effective date of this Act, except for Section 73,
beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm upon the proper
administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore,
an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, except for Section 73,
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

04-10-2025 16:59:30 JAP008